Maryland, session 2026, SB0592.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
7–205.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0592*

SENATE BILL 592
(b) The promotion of students in a public school and graduation from a public high
school shall be in accordance with:
(2) The rules and regulations of the State Board.
(c) (1) Each student who graduates from a public high school shall receive the
same type of diploma or certificate, regardless of the high school attended or the course
taken.
(2) The diploma or certificate shall state that the student has completed a
program of studies satisfactorily in accordance with the requirements of the State Board.
7–213.
(A) (1) THE STATE BOARD SHALL ESTABLISH A HIGH SCHOOL
GRADUATION REQUIREMENT IN FINANCIAL LITERACY THAT ALIGNS WITH THE
STATE CURRICULUM FOR PERSONAL FINANCIAL LITERACY EDUCATION GRADES
3–12 STANDARDS.
(2) THE FINANCIAL LITERACY GRADUATION REQUIREMENT
ESTABLISHED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION SHALL BE:
(I) AT LEAST 1 SEMESTER IN LENGTH;
(II) TAUGHT IN GRADES 11 OR 12; AND
(III) A STANDALONE COURSE AND NOT EMBEDDED IN OTHER
COURSEWORK.
(B) EACH COUNTY BOARD MAY DETERMINE THE CURRICULUM,
INSTRUCTIONAL MATERIALS, AND DEPARTMENTAL PLACEMENT OF THE PERSONAL
FINANCIAL LITERACY COURSE IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE STATE PERSONAL
FINANCIAL LITERACY EDUCATION GRADES 3–12 STANDARDS AND THIS SECTION.
(C) (1) BEGINNING WITH THE GRADUATING CLASS OF 2030, EACH HIGH
SCHOOL STUDENT SHALL SUCCESSFULLY COMPLETE A PERSONAL FINANCIAL
LITERACY COURSE THAT MEETS THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SECTION.
(2) ON SUCCESSFUL COMPLETION OF THE COURSE, A COUNTY BOARD
SHALL:
(I) AWARD THE STUDENT AT LEAST ONE–HALF CREDIT
TOWARD THE REQUIREMENTS FOR A HIGH SCHOOL DIPLOMA; AND

SENATE BILL 592 3
(II) ALLOW THE STUDENT TO FULFILL ANY REMAINING
ONE–HALF CREDIT REQUIREMENT THROUGH AN EXISTING COURSE IN BUSINESS,
CAREER AND TECHNICAL EDUCATION, ELECTIVES, FAMILY AND CONSUMER
SCIENCES, MATHEMATICS, OR SOCIAL STUDIES.
(D) NOTHING IN THIS SECTION SHALL BE CONSTRUED TO RESTRICT A
COUNTY BOARD TO:
(1) USE A SPECIFIC CURRICULUM, VENDOR, OR PUBLISHER OR
SPECIFIC INSTRUCTIONAL MATERIALS FOR THE PERSONAL FINANCIAL LITERACY
COURSE; OR
(2) REQUIRE THE COURSE TO BE TAUGHT EXCLUSIVELY WITHIN A
SPECIFIC DEPARTMENT OR SUBJECT AREA.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.